web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
abonat/Q
absorbant/Q
acaloric/Q
accizabil/Q
aciuat/Q
acrilic/Q
acumulat/Q
adaptiv/Q
administrativ/Q
adsorbat/Q
aero-mecanic/Q
afierosit/Q
afundat/Q
agravat/Q
ajustat/Q
alcalinizat/Q
algerian/Q
alocabil/Q
alunecos/Q
ambidextru/Q
amestecat/Q
amorezat/Q
anacronistic/Q
anastomotic/Q
anesteziat/Q
anihilator/Q
antemergator/Q
anticipant/Q
antidogmatic/Q
antimaterialist/Q
antiprezidential/Q
antisocialist/Q
antracenic/Q
apelabil/Q
apogamatic/Q
aprioristic/Q
arahnologic/Q
aretat/Q
arhieresc/Q
armator/Q
articulat/Q
aratat/Q
aservit/Q
asiro-babilonian/Q
astrofic/Q
aterogen/Q
atrofic/Q
australid/Q
autodemascat/Q
automatist/Q
autoutilat/Q
avocatit/Q
asezat/Q
balanoid/Q
barbian/Q
batimetric/Q
beletristic/Q
bezmeticit/Q
bidimensional/Q
binecredincios/Q
biomolecular/Q
bisericesc/Q
blefarostat/Q
bocanitor/Q
bondoc/Q
boxat/Q
briologic/Q
brutalizat/Q
bucalat/Q
bulevardier/Q
burlacit/Q
baiguit/Q
baietit/Q
banit/Q
bautor/Q
caiacist/Q
calibror/Q
cambrian/Q
canoist/Q
capreolat/Q
carbonatic/Q
carnat/Q
casmofil/Q
catehizat/Q
cazat/Q
cenaclist/Q
cercat/Q
cersetorit/Q
chemoreceptor/Q
chinofil/Q
chitait/Q
cimbalist/Q
ciobanesc/Q
circumstelar/Q
ciudat/Q
clasat/Q
clipitor/Q
clovnesc/Q
coacuzat/Q
cocator/Q
cojocarit/Q
colmatat/Q
comatic/Q
comisionar/Q
complectat/Q
compresor/Q
concav/Q
concordat/Q
conexat/Q
congelabil/Q
conservatorist/Q
constringent/Q
contat/Q
contractat/Q
controversabil/Q
convulsionat/Q
copilarit/Q
corectabil/Q
corniculat/Q
cosemnatar/Q
cracovian/Q
creponat/Q
crioluminescent/Q
criticat/Q
crucifer/Q
cuantificator/Q
culpabil/Q
cuneat/Q
curios/Q
cuviincios/Q
cvasidescifrabil/Q
carcait/Q
calcator/Q
carat/Q
catait/Q
darnic/Q
decagonal/Q
decimetric/Q
decompozabil/Q
decurs/Q
deficitar/Q
degenerescent/Q
delegat/Q
demarcational/Q
demonstrat/Q
denominativ/Q
depistat/Q
deproteinizat/Q
derogabil/Q
desclestat/Q
descultat/Q
desferecat/Q
desmit/Q
destroienit/Q
detector/Q
deversat/Q
dezangajat/Q
dezgropat/Q
dezmierdat/Q
dezvoltat/Q
diagnosticabil/Q
dichisit/Q
difuzat/Q
dinamitard/Q
disciplinat/Q
disipator/Q
dispus/Q
divanit/Q
docetism/Q
doljean/Q
dorian/Q
drajefiat/Q
dracuit/Q
dumesnicit/Q
dabalat/Q
ebenist/Q
ecluzier/Q
edematos/Q
efuziv/Q
elector/Q
electronizat/Q
elizeic/Q
emis/Q
endocrinian/Q
enterorenal/Q
epifizar/Q
equinoxial/Q
erozional/Q
estetic/Q
eteroclit/Q
eufemizant/Q
evadat/Q
ex-candidat/Q
exclusivist/Q
existentialist/Q
expiat/Q
expropriator/Q
extracarpatic/Q
extrasic/Q
factios/Q
fantasc/Q
fastigiat/Q
feldspatic/Q
fericit/Q
fetid/Q
figurat/Q
filoportughez/Q
firitisit/Q
fizio-psihologic/Q
flexibilizat/Q
fluoritic/Q
folcloristic/Q
forfait/Q
fost/Q
franc/Q
fricativ/Q
frau/Q
funcic/Q
furnizat/Q
falos/Q
galeofob/Q
gargarisit/Q
gelificat/Q
genitourinar/Q
germinat/Q
ghimpat/Q
giroagregat/Q
glodoros/Q
gogonat/Q
grafometric/Q
greco-latin/Q
griv/Q
grasuliu/Q
guvernamental/Q
gainar/Q
haiducit/Q
haric/Q
heliotehnic/Q
heterogenetic/Q
hidroameliorativ/Q
higrofob/Q
hipoclorit/Q
hocheist/Q
homotipic/Q
hranit/Q
husit/Q
hacuit/Q
hazos/Q
idiopatic/Q
ignat/Q
imaginativ/Q
impacientat/Q
implantat/Q
imprimant/Q
inacomodabil/Q
incalculabil/Q
incomutabil/Q
incurbat/Q
indignat/Q
inechitabil/Q
infatigabil/Q
infractional/Q
initiatic/Q
insectofungicid/Q
instantaneu/Q
integrator/Q
interchimbat/Q
internat/Q
interuman/Q
intramagmatic/Q
inundabil/Q
investigator/Q
ipotecat/Q
ireprosabil/Q
ispovedit/Q
iterativ/Q
izolat/Q
jelitor/Q
jonctor/Q
jupuit/Q
khmer/Q
lactovegetarian/Q
lapidicol/Q
leal/Q
lehametisit/Q
levigabil/Q
libidinal/Q
liliput/Q
lingusit/Q
literarartistic/Q
locvace/Q
lucid/Q
lungaret/Q
lacomit/Q
laudaros/Q
macru/Q
mahoni/Q
maltat/Q
manierizat/Q
margaric/Q
marsat/Q
maternal/Q
mazilit/Q
medico-militar/Q
melafic/Q
menajer/Q
merinozat/Q
metalifer/Q
metis/Q
micotic/Q
mieros/Q
milogit/Q
minimalizator/Q
miscelaneu/Q
mixat/Q
mocosit/Q
moezic/Q
monadic/Q
monocromatic/Q
monopartid/Q
monticol/Q
mortezat/Q
motrosit/Q
mucezit/Q
multigrad/Q
muntean/Q
muscadebazdarat/Q
muscat/Q
mangaitor/Q
magarit/Q
maracinit/Q
narangiu/Q
navigabil/Q
neadecvat/Q
neasemuit/Q
nechezat/Q
necoordonat/Q
nedeformabil/Q
nedumirit/Q
nefrotic/Q
negru/Q
neistovit/Q
nemultamit/Q
neodarvinist/Q
neonatal/Q
nepoluat/Q
nerecunoscator/Q
nesesizat/Q
netezit/Q
nevestejit/Q
neinduplecat/Q
nigerian/Q
nivelat/Q
nonconformist/Q
notabil/Q
numbat/Q
naclait/Q
nascut/Q
obcordat/Q
obovat/Q
obstesc/Q
ocultistic/Q
oficios/Q
oleostatic/Q
ontogenist/Q
oprit/Q
ordinal/Q
ortopedist/Q
otravit/Q
paleoclimatic/Q
pantoclast/Q
paratirisit/Q
particularizat/Q
pavat/Q
peltinerv/Q
perfectivizat/Q
persan/Q
pesin/Q
pintenog/Q
piuat/Q
plenuit/Q
pluripartidic/Q
pogromist/Q
polisemantic/Q
popistrit/Q
postat/Q
pozitionat/Q
preconceput/Q
prejudiciabil/Q
prescris/Q
prezumabil/Q
prins/Q
proclamator/Q
proiectabil/Q
prosector/Q
prozaizant/Q
pseudoistoric/Q
pulsat/Q
putregaios/Q
pagubos/Q
pazit/Q
rafinor/Q
reabsolutizat/Q
readorat/Q
realegat/Q
reamuzat/Q
reapupat/Q
reasistat/Q
reautoinstruit/Q
rebetegit/Q
rebotit/Q
rebusist/Q
recafelit/Q
recatapultat/Q
rechiftit/Q
reciugulit/Q
recoclit/Q
reconceput/Q
recontrapus/Q
recrutat/Q
recainat/Q
redecalcat/Q
redelaturat/Q
redepravat/Q
redescurcat/Q
redezlanat/Q
redoftoricit/Q
redupait/Q
reelectrocauterizat/Q
reevazat/Q
reezitat/Q
refiltrat/Q
refornait/Q
refuserit/Q
reghilosat/Q
regrindinat/Q
rehamletizat/Q
rehutupit/Q
reignifugat/Q
reinferat/Q
reintervievat/Q
reizbavit/Q
relativizat/Q
relingusit/Q
remacerat/Q
remasinizat/Q
remiluit/Q
remonodiat/Q
remurdarit/Q
renan/Q
renovator/Q
reobscurizat/Q
reopacit/Q
reparabil/Q
repensulat/Q
repiperat/Q
reploconit/Q
reportericit/Q
repreliminat/Q
reprimenit/Q
repropasit/Q
repuricat/Q
reracolat/Q
rereanalizat/Q
rerecurbat/Q
rerejudecat/Q
rerepugnat/Q
rereincarnat/Q
rerusificat/Q
rerasadit/Q
rescris/Q
resosit/Q
resuit/Q
retemporizat/Q
retoropit/Q
retriumfat/Q
retaiat/Q
reurinat/Q
revexat/Q
revrednicit/Q
rezbihuit/Q
rezincografiat/Q
rezaluzit/Q
reimbarbatat/Q
reimparosat/Q
reincorporat/Q
reindeletnicit/Q
reinfurcat/Q
reinlacramat/Q
reinspaimantat/Q
reinvechit/Q
reinsurubat/Q
resovalcait/Q
retarcait/Q
rocosit/Q
rourat/Q
rusienesc/Q
racnit/Q
rasucitor/Q
sablator/Q
sanctificat/Q
savoiard/Q
schimbator/Q
scovardat/Q
scarnavit/Q
sedus/Q
semifabricat/Q
semnificat/Q
servil/Q
shakespearean/Q
silmanal/Q
sincopat/Q
siv/Q
social/Q
somesean/Q
spelb/Q
spoliator/Q
stabilizator/Q
stereomecanic/Q
storcosit/Q
strafulgerator/Q
subarboret/Q
subpamantean/Q
sufericios/Q
supercivilizat/Q
supranumit/Q
surpinzator/Q
saltat/Q
talentat/Q
tasist/Q
temperamentos/Q
termoizolator/Q
timpanic/Q
tonificat/Q
transcendentalizat/Q
tranzitar/Q
triboelectric/Q
tropicalizat/Q
tunisian/Q
targuit/Q
tauit/Q
umanistic/Q
uniliniar/Q
urat/Q
uruguayan/Q
valid/Q
venerabil/Q
vexatoriu/Q
vinietist/Q
viziral/Q
vornicit/Q
vanzator/Q
walon/Q
zbuciumator/Q
zguduitor/Q
zoometric/Q
zalezit/Q
imbucurat/Q
impoporat/Q
impaturit/Q
incoltat/Q
incalecat/Q
induiosator/Q
infatat/Q
injunghiat/Q
inrubedenit/Q
intomnat/Q
invergat/Q
inzidit/Q
santagist/Q
smecheresc/Q
stiintificofantastic/Q
tiganos/Q
antiromanit/Q
